Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 7
Transition

§ 28-9-701. [Reserved.]

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-701, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-702. Savings clause.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, this act applies to a transaction or lien within its scope, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before this act takes effect.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section and sections 28-9-703 through 28-9-709[, Idaho Code]:

Transactions and liens that were not governed by former chapter 9, title 28, Idaho Code, were validly entered into or created before this act takes effect, and would be subject to this act if they had been entered into or created after this act takes effect, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from those transactions and liens remain valid after this act takes effect; and

The transactions and liens may be terminated, completed, consummated and enforced as required or permitted by this act or by the law that otherwise would apply if this act had not taken effect.

This act does not affect an action, case or proceeding commenced before this act takes effect.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-702, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-703. Security interest perfected before effective date.

A security interest that is enforceable immediately before this act takes effect and would have priority over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time is a perfected security interest under this act if, when this act takes effect, the applicable requirements for enforceability and perfection under this act are satisfied without further action.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-705[, Idaho Code], if, immediately before this act takes effect, a security interest is enforceable and would have priority over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time, but the applicable requirements for enforceability or perfection under this act are not satisfied when this act takes effect, the security interest:

Is a perfected security interest for one (1) year after this act takes effect;

Remains enforceable thereafter only if the security interest becomes enforceable under section 28-9-203[, Idaho Code,] before the year expires; and

Remains perfected thereafter only if the applicable requirements for perfection under this act are satisfied before the year expires.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-703, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-704. Security interest unperfected before effective date.

A security interest that is enforceable immediately before this act takes effect but which would be subordinate to the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time:

Remains an enforceable security interest for one (1) year after this act takes effect;

Remains enforceable thereafter if the security interest becomes enforceable under section 28-9-203[, Idaho Code,] when this act takes effect or within one (1) year thereafter; and

Becomes perfected:

Without further action, when this act takes effect if the applicable requirements for perfection under this act are satisfied before or at that time; or

When the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that time.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-704, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-705. Effectiveness of action taken before effective date.

If action, other than the filing of a financing statement, is taken before this act takes effect and the action would have resulted in priority of a security interest over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor had the security interest become enforceable before this act takes effect, the action is effective to perfect a security interest that attaches under this act within one (1) year after this act takes effect. An attached security interest becomes unperfected one (1) year after this act takes effect unless the security interest becomes a perfected security interest under this act before the expiration of that period.

The filing of a financing statement before this act takes effect is effective to perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy the applicable requirements for perfection under this act.

This act does not render ineffective an effective financing statement that, before this act takes effect, is filed and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in former section 28-9-103[, Idaho Code]. However, except as otherwise provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this section and section 28-9-706[, Idaho Code], the financing statement ceases to be effective at the earlier of:

The time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective under the law of the jurisdiction in which it is filed; or

June 30, 2006.

The filing of a continuation statement after this act takes effect does not continue the effectiveness of the financing statement filed before this act takes effect. However, upon the timely filing of a continuation statement after this act takes effect and in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in part 3[, chapter 9, title 28, Idaho Code], the effectiveness of a financing statement filed in the same office in that jurisdiction before this act takes effect continues for the period provided by the law of that jurisdiction.

Subsection (c)(2) of this section applies to a financing statement that, before this act takes effect, is filed against a transmitting utility and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in former section 28-9-103[, Idaho Code,] only to the extent that part 3[, chapter 9, title 28, Idaho Code,] provides that the law of a jurisdiction other than jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed governs perfection of a security interest in collateral covered by the financing statement.

A financing statement that includes a financing statement filed before this act takes effect and a continuation statement filed after this act takes effect is effective only to the extent that it satisfies the requirements of part 5 for an initial financing statement.

A financing statement filed as a fixture, timber or mineral filing before July 1, 2001 (except for a record of mortgage which is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing) shall cease to be effective after June 30, 2006. The effectiveness of such a financing statement may be continued by filing a continuation statement between January 1, 2006, and June 30, 2006, inclusive. The new five (5) year effective period for such a financing statement, as provided in section 28-9-515[, Idaho Code], shall commence on the date of filing such continuation statement.
History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-705, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2002, ch. 107, § 6, p. 290.

§ 28-9-706. When initial financing statement suffices to continue effectiveness of financing statement.

The filing of an initial financing statement in the office specified in section 28-9-501[, Idaho Code,] continues the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before this act takes effect if:

The filing of an initial financing statement in that office would be effective to perfect a security interest under this act;

The preeffective-date financing statement was filed in an office in another state or another office in this state; and

The initial financing statement satisfies subsection (c) of this section.

The filing of an initial financing statement under subsection (a) of this section continues the effectiveness of the preeffective-date financing statement:

If the initial financing statement is filed before this act takes effect, for the period provided in former section 28-9-403[, Idaho Code,] with respect to a financing statement; and

If the initial financing statement is filed after this act takes effect, for the period provided in section 28-9-515[, Idaho Code,] with respect to an initial financing statement.

To be effective for purposes of subsection (a) of this section, an initial financing statement must:

Satisfy the requirements of part 5[, chapter 9, title 28, Idaho Code,] for an initial financing statement;

Identify the preeffective-date financing statement by indicating the office in which the financing statement was filed and providing the dates of filing and file numbers, if any, of the financing statement and of the most recent continuation statement filed with respect to the financing statement; and

Indicate that the preeffective-date financing statement remains effective.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-706, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-707. Amendment of preeffective-date financing statement.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this part if:

In this section, “preeffective-date financing statement” means a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001.

After July 1, 2001, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in, a preeffective-date financing statement only in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in part 3[, chapter 9, title 28, Idaho Code]. However, the effectiveness of a preeffective-date financing statement also may be terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, if the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the information in a preeffective-date financing statement may be amended only if:

The preeffective-date financing statement and an amendment are filed in the office specified in section 28-9-501[, Idaho Code];

An amendment is filed in the office specified in section 28-9-501[, Idaho Code], concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an initial financing statement that satisfies the provisions of subsection (c) of section 28-9-706[, Idaho Code]; or

An initial financing statement that provides the information as amended and satisfies the provisions of subsection (c) of section 28-9-706[, Idaho Code], is filed in the office specified in section 28-9-501[, Idaho Code].

If the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a preeffective-date financing statement may be continued only pursuant to the provisions of subsections (d) and (f) of section 28-9-705[, Idaho Code], or section 28-9-706[, Idaho Code].

Whether or not the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a preeffective-date financing statement filed in this state may be terminated by filing a termination statement in the office in which the preeffective-date financing statement is filed, unless an initial financing statement that satisfies the provisions of subsection (c) of section 28-9-706[, Idaho Code], has been filed in the office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in part 3[, chapter 9, title 28, Idaho Code,] as the office in which to file a financing statement.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-707, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2004, ch. 304, § 2, p. 852.

§ 28-9-708. Persons entitled to file initial financing statement or continuation statement.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this part if:

The secured party of record authorizes the filing; and

The filing is necessary under this part:

To continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before this act takes effect; or

To perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-708, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-709. Priority.

This act determines the priority of conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before this act takes effect, former chapter 9, title 28[, Idaho Code], determines priority.

For purposes of section 28-9-322(a)[, Idaho Code], the priority of a security interest that becomes enforceable under section 28-9-203[, Idaho Code,] of this act dates from the time this act takes effect if the security interest is perfected under this act by the filing of a financing statement before this act takes effect which would not have been effective to perfect the security interest under former chapter 9, title 28[, Idaho Code]. This subsection does not apply to conflicting security interests, each of which is perfected by the filing of such a financing statement.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-709, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.